apertium-fra-spa.fra.metadix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz0123456789</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="fts"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="percent"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="ppres"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="ND"/>
    <sdef n="hour"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

    <pardef n="ordinales">
      <e><p><l>1er</l>              <r>1er<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>1re</l>              <r>1er<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>1ers</l>             <r>1er<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>1res</l>             <r>1er<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>1r</l>        <r>1er<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>1ère</l>      <r>1er<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>1rs</l>       <r>1er<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>1ères</l>     <r>1er<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>2d</l>        <r>2d<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>2de</l>       <r>2d<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>2ds</l>       <r>2d<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>2des</l>      <r>2d<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>2nd</l>       <r>2d<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>2nde</l>      <r>2d<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>2nds</l>      <r>2d<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>2ndes</l>     <r>2d<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>([0-9]+[0-9]|[02-9])</re><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>([0-9]+[0-9]|[02-9])</re><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>([0-9]+[0-9]|[02-9])</re><p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>([0-9]+[0-9]|[02-9])</re><p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>([0-9]*[0-9]|[02-9])</re><p><l>me</l><r>e<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>([0-9]*[0-9]|[02-9])</re><p><l>me</l><r>e<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>([0-9]*[0-9]|[02-9])</re><p><l>mes</l><r>e<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>([0-9]*[0-9]|[02-9])</re><p><l>mes</l><r>e<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>([0-9]*[0-9]|[02-9])</re><p><l>ème</l><r>e<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>([0-9]*[0-9]|[02-9])</re><p><l>ème</l><r>e<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>([0-9]*[0-9]|[02-9])</re><p><l>èmes</l><r>e<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>([0-9]*[0-9]|[02-9])</re><p><l>èmes</l><r>e<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>([0-9]*[0-9]|[02-9])</re><p><l>ième</l><r>e<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>([0-9]*[0-9]|[02-9])</re><p><l>ième</l><r>e<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>([0-9]*[0-9]|[02-9])</re><p><l>ièmes</l><r>e<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>([0-9]*[0-9]|[02-9])</re><p><l>ièmes</l><r>e<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="urls">
      <e><re>(http://|https://|ftp://)?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*)*(.[a-z][a-z]|.aero|.asia|.biz|.cat|.com|.coop|.edu|.gov|.info|.int|.jobs|.mil|.mobi|.museum|.name|.net|.org|.pro|.tel|.travel)(/([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*/)*([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*)?)?</re><!--      <re>(((www.)|(http://))[a-z0-9\-]+([.][a-z]+)+(/[a-z0-9_]+)*([.][a-z]+)*)</re> --><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="emails">
      <e><re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><re>,</re><p><l></l>       <r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>[\+\-]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[\+\-]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[ ]?\-[ ]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[\+\-]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[ ]?%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[\+\-]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[ ]?\-[ ]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?([ ]?%)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l>  <r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l>  <r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separ">
      <e><re>¿</re><p><l></l>       <r><s n="lquest"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e r="LR"><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/></l>      <r></r></p><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="horas">
      <e><re>[0-2]?[0-9]h[0-6][0-9]</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="hour"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="XXème__adj">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ème</l>       <r>ème<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l>                <r>ème<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="abaissant__adj">
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l>                <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l>                <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l>               <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="adjoint">                        <i>adjoint</i><par n="abaissant__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="aisé">                           <i>aisé</i><par n="abaissant__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="antéposé" a="eleka">             <i>antéposé</i><par n="abaissant__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ardent">                         <i>ardent</i><par n="abaissant__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="brut">                           <i>brut</i><par n="abaissant__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="congruent" a="eleka">            <i>congruent</i><par n="abaissant__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="défavorisé" a="eleka">           <i>défavorisé</i><par n="abaissant__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dirigé" a="webform">             <i>dirigé</i><par n="abaissant__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="encourageant" a="eleka">         <i>encourageant</i><par n="abaissant__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="euphorisant" a="eleka">          <i>euphorisant</i><par n="abaissant__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fortuné">                        <i>fortuné</i><par n="abaissant__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="I">                              <i>I</i><par n="XXème__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="idéal">                          <i>idéal</i><par n="abaissant__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="II">                             <i>II</i><par n="XXème__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="III">                            <i>III</i><par n="XXème__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="incontesté" a="eleka">           <i>incontesté</i><par n="abaissant__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="intelligent">                    <i>intelligent</i><par n="abaissant__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="IV">                             <i>IV</i><par n="XXème__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="IX">                             <i>IX</i><par n="XXème__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="L">                              <i>L</i><par n="XXème__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="M">                              <i>M</i><par n="XXème__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="marin">                          <i>marin</i><par n="abaissant__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nouveau-né" a="eleka">           <i>nouveau-né</i><par n="abaissant__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="piquant" a="eleka">              <i>piquant</i><par n="abaissant__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rangé" a="webform">              <i>rangé</i><par n="abaissant__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="saint">                          <i>saint</i><par n="abaissant__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="subventionné" a="eleka">         <i>subventionné</i><par n="abaissant__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="V">                              <i>V</i><par n="XXème__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="VI">                             <i>VI</i><par n="XXème__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="VII">                            <i>VII</i><par n="XXème__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="VIII">                           <i>VIII</i><par n="XXème__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="violent">                        <i>violent</i><par n="abaissant__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="X">                              <i>X</i><par n="XXème__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="XI">                             <i>XI</i><par n="XXème__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="XII">                            <i>XII</i><par n="XXème__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="XIII">                           <i>XIII</i><par n="XXème__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="XIV">                            <i>XIV</i><par n="XXème__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="XIX">                            <i>XIX</i><par n="XXème__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="XV">                             <i>XV</i><par n="XXème__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="XVI">                            <i>XVI</i><par n="XXème__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="XVII">                           <i>XVII</i><par n="XXème__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="XX">                             <i>XX</i><par n="XXème__adj"/></e>
    <e>                                     <par n="ordinales"/></e>
    <e>                                     <par n="coma"/></e>
    <e>                                     <par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e>                                     <par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e>                                     <par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e>                                     <par n="separ"/></e>
    <e>                                     <par n="separa"/></e>
    <e>                                     <par n="emails"/></e>
    <e>                                     <par n="urls"/></e>
    <e>                                     <par n="horas"/></e>
